ckb/dictionaries/ckb.aff
PFX V 0 وەرتاننە .
PFX V 0 وەرتانب .
PFX V 0 وەریاندە .
PFX V 0 وەریانئە .
PFX V 0 وەریاننا .
PFX V 0 وەریانمە .
PFX V 0 وەریاننە .
PFX V 0 وەریانب .
PFX V 0 ڕۆمدە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆمئە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆمنا .
PFX V 0 ڕۆممە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆمنە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆمب .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتدە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتئە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتنا .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتمە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتنە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتب .
PFX V 0 ڕۆیدە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆیئە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆینا .
PFX V 0 ڕۆیمە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆینە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆیب .
PFX V 0 ڕۆماندە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆمانئە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆماننا .
PFX V 0 ڕۆمانمە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆماننە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆمانب .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتاندە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتانئە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتاننا .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتانمە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتاننە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆتانب .
PFX V 0 ڕۆیاندە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆیانئە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆیاننا .
PFX V 0 ڕۆیانمە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆیاننە .
PFX V 0 ڕۆیانب .
PFX V 0 بەرمدە .
PFX V 0 بەرمئە .
PFX V 0 بەرمنا .
PFX V 0 بەرممە .
PFX V 0 بەرمنە .
PFX V 0 بەرمب .
PFX V 0 بەرتدە .
PFX V 0 بەرتئە .
PFX V 0 بەرتنا .
PFX V 0 بەرتمە .
PFX V 0 بەرتنە .
PFX V 0 بەرتب .
PFX V 0 بەریدە .
PFX V 0 بەریئە .
PFX V 0 بەرینا .
PFX V 0 بەریمە .
PFX V 0 بەرینە .
PFX V 0 بەریب .
PFX V 0 بەرماندە .
PFX V 0 بەرمانئە .
PFX V 0 بەرماننا .
PFX V 0 بەرمانمە .
PFX V 0 بەرماننە .
PFX V 0 بەرمانب .
PFX V 0 بەرتاندە .
PFX V 0 بەرتانئە .
PFX V 0 بەرتاننا .
PFX V 0 بەرتانمە .
PFX V 0 بەرتاننە .
PFX V 0 بەرتانب .
PFX V 0 بەریاندە .
PFX V 0 بەریانئە .
PFX V 0 بەریاننا .
PFX V 0 بەریانمە .
PFX V 0 بەریاننە .
PFX V 0 بەریانب .
PFX V 0 وێکمدە .
PFX V 0 وێکمئە .
PFX V 0 وێکمنا .
PFX V 0 وێکممە .
PFX V 0 وێکمنە .
PFX V 0 وێکمب .
PFX V 0 وێکتدە .
PFX V 0 وێکتئە .
PFX V 0 وێکتنا .
PFX V 0 وێکتمە .
PFX V 0 وێکتنە .
PFX V 0 وێکتب .
PFX V 0 وێکیدە .
PFX V 0 وێکیئە .
PFX V 0 وێکینا .
PFX V 0 وێکیمە .
PFX V 0 وێکینە .
PFX V 0 وێکیب .
PFX V 0 وێکماندە .
PFX V 0 وێکمانئە .
PFX V 0 وێکماننا .
PFX V 0 وێکمانمە .
PFX V 0 وێکماننە .
PFX V 0 وێکمانب .
PFX V 0 وێکتاندە .
PFX V 0 وێکتانئە .
PFX V 0 وێکتاننا .
PFX V 0 وێکتانمە .
PFX V 0 وێکتاننە .
PFX V 0 وێکتانب .
PFX V 0 وێکیاندە .
PFX V 0 وێکیانئە .
PFX V 0 وێکیاننا .
PFX V 0 وێکیانمە .
PFX V 0 وێکیاننە .
PFX V 0 وێکیانب .
PFX V 0 لێکمدە .
PFX V 0 لێکمئە .
PFX V 0 لێکمنا .
PFX V 0 لێکممە .
PFX V 0 لێکمنە .
PFX V 0 لێکمب .
PFX V 0 لێکتدە .
PFX V 0 لێکتئە .
PFX V 0 لێکتنا .
PFX V 0 لێکتمە .
PFX V 0 لێکتنە .
PFX V 0 لێکتب .
PFX V 0 لێکیدە .
PFX V 0 لێکیئە .
PFX V 0 لێکینا .
PFX V 0 لێکیمە .
PFX V 0 لێکینە .
PFX V 0 لێکیب .
PFX V 0 لێکماندە .
PFX V 0 لێکمانئە .
PFX V 0 لێکماننا .
PFX V 0 لێکمانمە .
PFX V 0 لێکماننە .
PFX V 0 لێکمانب .
PFX V 0 لێکتاندە .
PFX V 0 لێکتانئە .
PFX V 0 لێکتاننا .
PFX V 0 لێکتانمە .
PFX V 0 لێکتاننە .
PFX V 0 لێکتانب .
PFX V 0 لێکیاندە .
PFX V 0 لێکیانئە .
PFX V 0 لێکیاننا .
PFX V 0 لێکیانمە .
PFX V 0 لێکیاننە .
PFX V 0 لێکیانب .

########################################################################################
# There are two suffixal morphemes:
# Agent pronoun (م ت ی مان تان یان)
# repetition suffix (ەوە)
########################################################################################

SFX V Y 30
SFX V 0 م . 
SFX V 0 ی .
SFX V 0 یت .
SFX V 0 ێ [^ۆ]
SFX V 0 ێت [^ۆ]
SFX V ۆ وا ۆ
SFX V ۆ وات ۆ
SFX V 0 ین .
SFX V 0 ن .
SFX V 0 ەوە [^ایێە]
SFX V 0 وە [ەا]
SFX V 0 یەوە [ێی]
SFX V 0 مەوە . 
SFX V 0 ییەوە .
SFX V 0 یەوە .
SFX V 0 یتەوە .
SFX V 0 ێیەوە [^ۆ]
SFX V 0 ێتەوە [^ۆ]
SFX V ۆ واتەوە ۆ
SFX V 0 ینەوە .
SFX V 0 نەوە .
SFX V 0 ە [^ایێەۆوچ] # BEGIN: Imperative
SFX V 0 ەرەوە [^ایێەۆو]
SFX V 0 نە [^ایێەۆو]
SFX V 0 نەوە [^ایێەۆو]
SFX V 0 رەوە [ایێەۆو]
SFX V 0 وە [ایێەۆو]
SFX V 0 ۆ [چ]
SFX V 0 ۆوە [چ]
SFX V 0 ۆرەوە [چ] # END: Imperative

######### Passive of present tenses ##################################################
# The passive form in the Kurdish is in fact derived from the present stem of transitive verbs.
# Knowing these, the following rules can analyse any passive form given the present stem tagged with P flag.
# Later, I found out that manually curating passive verb forms instead of using the following derivational rules makes things easier.
# Even if no word is tagged with P flag, the rules can be used and are beneficial for derivational morphemes.
# 02/11/2020 -- Sina
########################################################################################

SFX P Y 239
SFX P 0 درام/V . # BEGIN: Simple past/Progressive past
SFX P 0 درای/V .
SFX P 0 درایت/V .
SFX P 0 درا/V .
SFX P 0 دراین/V .
SFX P 0 دران/V .
SFX P 0 رام/V .
SFX P 0 رای/V .
SFX P 0 رایت/V .
SFX P 0 را/V .
SFX P 0 راین/V .
SFX P 0 ران/V .
SFX P 0 درامە/V .
SFX P 0 درایە/V .
SFX P 0 درایتە/V .
SFX P 0 درایە/V .
SFX P 0 دراینە/V .
SFX P 0 درانە/V .
SFX P 0 رامە/V .
SFX P 0 رایە/V .
SFX P 0 رایتە/V .
SFX P 0 رایە/V .
SFX P 0 راینە/V .
SFX P 0 رانە/V .
SFX P 0 درامەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درایەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درایتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درایەوە/V .
SFX P 0 دراینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درانەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رامەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رایەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رایتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رایەوە/V .
SFX P 0 راینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رانەوە/V . # END: Simple past/Progressive past
SFX P 0 درێم/V . # BEGIN: Simple present
SFX P 0 درێی/V .
SFX P 0 درێیت/V .
SFX P 0 درێ/V .
SFX P 0 درێین/V .
SFX P 0 درێن/V .
SFX P 0 رێم/V .
SFX P 0 رێی/V .
SFX P 0 رێیت/V .
SFX P 0 رێ/V .
SFX P 0 رێین/V .
SFX P 0 رێن/V .
SFX P 0 درێمە/V .
SFX P 0 درێیە/V .
SFX P 0 درێیتە/V .
SFX P 0 درێە/V .
SFX P 0 درێینە/V .
SFX P 0 درێنە/V .
SFX P 0 رێمە/V .
SFX P 0 رێیە/V .
SFX P 0 رێیتە/V .
SFX P 0 رێە/V .
SFX P 0 رێینە/V .
SFX P 0 رێنە/V .
SFX P 0 درێمەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درێیەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درێیتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درێەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درێینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درێنەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رێمەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رێیەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رێیتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رێەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رێینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رێنەوە/V . # END: Simple present
SFX P 0 دراوم/V . # BEGIN: Present perfect
SFX P 0 دراوی/V .
SFX P 0 دراویت/V .
SFX P 0 دراو/V .
SFX P 0 دراوین/V .
SFX P 0 دراون/V .
SFX P 0 راوم/V .
SFX P 0 راوی/V .
SFX P 0 راویت/V .
SFX P 0 راو/V .
SFX P 0 راوین/V .
SFX P 0 راون/V .
SFX P 0 دراومە/V .
SFX P 0 دراویە/V .
SFX P 0 دراویتە/V .
SFX P 0 دراوە/V .
SFX P 0 دراوینە/V .
SFX P 0 دراونە/V .
SFX P 0 راومە/V .
SFX P 0 راویە/V .
SFX P 0 راویتە/V .
SFX P 0 راوە/V .
SFX P 0 راوینە/V .
SFX P 0 راونە/V .
SFX P 0 دراومەوە/V .
SFX P 0 دراویەوە/V .
SFX P 0 دراویتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 دراوەوە/V .
SFX P 0 دراوینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 دراونەوە/V .
SFX P 0 راومەوە/V .
SFX P 0 راویەوە/V .
SFX P 0 راویتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 راوەوە/V .
SFX P 0 راوینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 راونەوە/V . # END: Present perfect
SFX P 0 درابووم/V . # BEGIN: Past perfect
SFX P 0 درابووی/V .
SFX P 0 درابوویت/V .
SFX P 0 درابوو/V .
SFX P 0 درابووین/V .
SFX P 0 درابوون/V .
SFX P 0 رابووم/V .
SFX P 0 رابووی/V .
SFX P 0 رابوویت/V .
SFX P 0 رابوو/V .
SFX P 0 رابووین/V .
SFX P 0 رابوون/V .
SFX P 0 درابوومە/V .
SFX P 0 درابوویە/V .
SFX P 0 درابوویتە/V .
SFX P 0 درابووە/V .
SFX P 0 درابووینە/V .
SFX P 0 درابوونە/V .
SFX P 0 رابوومە/V .
SFX P 0 رابوویە/V .
SFX P 0 رابوویتە/V .
SFX P 0 رابووە/V .
SFX P 0 رابووینە/V .
SFX P 0 رابوونە/V .
SFX P 0 درابوومەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابوویەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابوویتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابووەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابووینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابوونەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابوومەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابوویەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابوویتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابووەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابووینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابوونەوە/V . # END: Past perfect
SFX P 0 درابم/V . # BEGIN: Past subjunctive
SFX P 0 درابی/V .
SFX P 0 درابیت/V .
SFX P 0 دراب/V .
SFX P 0 درابین/V .
SFX P 0 درابن/V .
SFX P 0 رابم/V .
SFX P 0 رابی/V .
SFX P 0 رابیت/V .
SFX P 0 راب/V .
SFX P 0 رابین/V .
SFX P 0 رابن/V .
SFX P 0 درابمە/V .
SFX P 0 درابیە/V .
SFX P 0 درابیتە/V .
SFX P 0 درابە/V .
SFX P 0 درابینە/V .
SFX P 0 درابنە/V .
SFX P 0 رابمە/V .
SFX P 0 رابیە/V .
SFX P 0 رابیتە/V .
SFX P 0 رابە/V .
SFX P 0 رابینە/V .
SFX P 0 رابنە/V .
SFX P 0 درابمەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابیەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابیتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابنەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابمەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابیەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابیتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابنەوە/V . # END: Past subjunctive
SFX P 0 درابام/V . # BEGIN: Past conditional
SFX P 0 درابای/V .
SFX P 0 درابایت/V .
SFX P 0 درابا/V .
SFX P 0 دراباین/V .
SFX P 0 درابان/V .
SFX P 0 رابام/V .
SFX P 0 رابای/V .
SFX P 0 رابایت/V .
SFX P 0 رابا/V .
SFX P 0 راباین/V .
SFX P 0 رابان/V .
SFX P 0 درابامە/V .
SFX P 0 درابایە/V .
SFX P 0 درابایتە/V .
SFX P 0 درابایە/V .
SFX P 0 دراباینە/V .
SFX P 0 درابانە/V .
SFX P 0 رابامە/V .
SFX P 0 رابایە/V .
SFX P 0 رابایتە/V .
SFX P 0 رابایە/V .
SFX P 0 راباینە/V .
SFX P 0 رابانە/V .
SFX P 0 درابامەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابایەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابایتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابایەوە/V .
SFX P 0 دراباینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درابانەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابامەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابایەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابایتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابایەوە/V .
SFX P 0 راباینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رابانەوە/V . 
SFX P 0 درایامە/V .
SFX P 0 درایایە/V .
SFX P 0 درایایتە/V .
SFX P 0 درایا/V .
SFX P 0 درایاینە/V .
SFX P 0 درایانە/V .
SFX P 0 رایامە/V .
SFX P 0 رایایە/V .
SFX P 0 رایایتە/V .
SFX P 0 رایاینە/V .
SFX P 0 رایانە/V .
SFX P 0 درایامەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درایایەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درایایتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درایایەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درایاینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 درایانەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رایامەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رایایەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رایایتەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رایایەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رایاینەوە/V .
SFX P 0 رایانەوە/V . # END: Past conditional

###############################################################################
##### Past tenses (کاتی ڕابردوو) 
###############################################################################
# Prefixes:
# - modal prefixes (دە ئە نە مە ب)
# - verbal prefixes (هەڵ بەر هتد)
# Suffixes:
# - agent suffixes (م ت ی مان تان یان)
# - patient suffixes (م یت ی ین ن)
# - repetition suffix (ەوە)
# - directional suffix (ە)
# - auxiliary morpheme (ت) in (چووە/ چووەتەوە بۆ) when directional suffix is used
###############################################################################

########## Intransitive verbs (I)##############################################

PFX I Y 107
PFX I 0 نە .
PFX I 0 دە .
PFX I 0 ئە .
PFX I 0 پێ .
PFX I 0 پێک .
PFX I 0 تێ .
PFX I 0 تێک .
PFX I 0 دا .
PFX I 0 دەر .
PFX I 0 ڕا .
PFX I 0 سەر .
PFX I 0 بەر .
PFX I 0 لێ .
PFX I 0 هەڵ .
PFX I 0 وێ .
PFX I 0 وەر .
PFX I 0 ڕۆ .
PFX I 0 بەر .
PFX I 0 وێک .
PFX I 0 لێک .
PFX I 0 نەدە .
PFX I 0 نەئە .
PFX I 0 پێدە .
PFX I 0 پێئە .
PFX I 0 پێکدە .
PFX I 0 پێکئە .
PFX I 0 تێدە .
PFX I 0 تێئە .
PFX I 0 تێکدە .
PFX I 0 تێکئە .
PFX I 0 دادە .
PFX I 0 دائە .
PFX I 0 دەردە .
PFX I 0 دەرئە .
PFX I 0 ڕادە .
PFX I 0 ڕائە .
PFX I 0 سەردە .
PFX I 0 سەرئە .
PFX I 0 بەردە .
PFX I 0 بەرئە .
PFX I 0 لێدە .
PFX I 0 لێئە .
PFX I 0 هەڵدە .
PFX I 0 هەڵئە .
PFX I 0 وێدە .
PFX I 0 وێئە .
PFX I 0 وەردە .
PFX I 0 وەرئە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆدە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆئە .
PFX I 0 بەردە .
PFX I 0 بەرئە .
PFX I 0 وێکدە .
PFX I 0 وێکئە .
PFX I 0 لێکدە .
PFX I 0 لێکئە .
PFX I 0 پێنە .
PFX I 0 پێکنە .
PFX I 0 تێنە .
PFX I 0 تێکنە .
PFX I 0 دانە .
PFX I 0 دەرنە .
PFX I 0 ڕانە .
PFX I 0 سەرنە .
PFX I 0 بەرنە .
PFX I 0 لێنە .
PFX I 0 هەڵنە .
PFX I 0 وێنە .
PFX I 0 وەرنە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆنە .
PFX I 0 بەرنە .
PFX I 0 وێکنە .
PFX I 0 لێکنە .
PFX I 0 پێنەدە .
PFX I 0 پێنەئە .
PFX I 0 پێکنەدە .
PFX I 0 پێکنەئە .
PFX I 0 تێنەدە .
PFX I 0 تێنەئە .
PFX I 0 تێکنەدە .
PFX I 0 تێکنەئە .
PFX I 0 دانەدە .
PFX I 0 دانەئە .
PFX I 0 دەرنەدە .
PFX I 0 دەرنەئە .
PFX I 0 ڕانەدە .
PFX I 0 ڕانەئە .
PFX I 0 سەرنەدە .
PFX I 0 سەرنەئە .
PFX I 0 بەرنەدە .
PFX I 0 بەرنەئە .
PFX I 0 لێنەدە .
PFX I 0 لێنەئە .
PFX I 0 هەڵنەدە .
PFX I 0 هەڵنەئە .
PFX I 0 وێنەدە .
PFX I 0 وێنەئە .
PFX I 0 وەرنەدە .
PFX I 0 وەرنەئە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆنەدە .
PFX I 0 ڕۆنەئە .
PFX I 0 بەرنەدە .
PFX I 0 بەرنەئە .
PFX I 0 وێکنەدە .
PFX I 0 وێکنەئە .
PFX I 0 لێکنەدە .
PFX I 0 لێکنەئە .
